bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Шпакли и стъргалки: Гъвкави шпакли; Тесни шпакли; Стъргалки за тапети и боя
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Шпатели и скребки: Гибкие шпатели; Жесткие шпатели; Скребки для снятия обоев и краски
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Spatole e raschietti per stucco: Raschietti per stucco flessibili; Raschietti per mastice rigidi; Raschietti per carta da parati e vernice
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > スクレイパー・へら: フレキシブルパテナイフ; スティフパテナイフ; 壁紙&ペイントスクレーパー
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Spatler og skrabejern: Fleksible spatler; Stive spatler; Tapet og malingsskrabejern
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Cuțite și raclete pentru chit: Cuțite flexibile pentru chit; Cuțite rigide pentru chit; Raclete pentru tapet și vopsea
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Szpachle i skrobaki: Elastyczne szpachle; Sztywne szpachle; Skrobaczki do tapet i farb
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Glaistymo peiliai ir grandikliai: Lankstūs glaistymo peiliai; Standūs glaistymo peiliai; Tapetų ir dažų grandikliai
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 刮刀和補土刀: 彈性油灰刀; 硬式油灰刀; 壁紙/油漆刮刀
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Dao trát ma-tít & Dao nạo: Dao trát ma-tít dẻo; Dao trát ma-tít cứng; Dụng cụ cạo giấy dán tường & sơn
en: Hardware > Tools > Putty Knives & Scrapers: Flexible Putty Knives; Stiff Putty Knives; Wallpaper & Paint Scrapers
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > เกรียงโป๊วและขูดสี: มีดโป๊วแบบยืดหยุ่น; มีดโป๊วขูดสี; เครื่องขูดวอลเปเปอร์และสี
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Spatules et grattoirs: Spatules flexibles; Spatules rigides; Grattoirs à papier peint et à peinture
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Kittmesser & -spachtel: Flexible Kittmesser; Steife Kittmesser; Tapeten- und Farbspachteln
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Färgskrapor och spackelknivar: Flexibla spackelknivar; Styva spackelknivar; Tapet- och färgskrapor
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Plamuurmessen en -schapers: Flexibele plamuurmessen; Stijve plamuurmessen; Behang- en verfschrapers
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 油灰刮刀: 柔性油灰刀; 硬油灰刀; 壁纸和涂料刮刀
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Špachtle a škrabky: Pružné špachtle; Pevné špachtle; Škrabky na tapety a barvy
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Kittiveitset ja lastat: Joustavat kittiveitset; Jäykät kittiveitset; Tapetti- ja maalikaapimet
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Noževi i strugalice za kit: Fleksibilni noževi za kit; Čvrsti noževi za kit; Strugači za tapete i boju
ko: 철물 > 도구 > 퍼티 나이프/스크레이퍼: 연질 퍼티 나이프; 경질 퍼티 나이프; 벽지/페인트 스크레이퍼
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Espátulas e raspadores: Espátulas flexíveis; Espátulas rígidas; Raspadores de papel de parede e tinta
sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Špachtle a stierky: Flexibilné špachtle; Pevné špachtle; Stierky na tapety a farby
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Raspadores y espátulas: Raspadores para masilla; Raspadores rígidos para masilla; Raspadores de pintura y papel tapiz
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Σπάτουλες στόκου & ξύστρες: Εύκαμπτες σπάτουλες στοκαρίσματος; Σκληρές σπάτουλες στοκαρίσματος; Ξύστρες ταπετσαρίας & βαφής
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Gladilke in strgala: Upogljive gladilke; Trdne gladilke; Strgala za tapete in barve
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Glettkések és -kaparók: Rugalmas glettkések; Merev glettkések; Tapéta- és festékkaparók
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Sparkler og skraper: Fleksible sparkelkniver; Skraper; Tapet- og malingsskrapere
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Ispatulalar ve Raspalar: Esnek Macun Bıçakları; Sert Macun Bıçakları; Duvar Kağıdı ve Boya Sıyırıcılar
pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Espátulas e raspadores: Espátulas flexíveis; Espátulas rígidas; Raspadores de papel de parede e tinta